New York, session 2025-2026, A10171.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 344-r of the highway law, as added by chapter 398 2 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Detec- 4 tive Thomas M. Inman. The bridge over the eastbound and westbound lanes 5 of the Southern State Parkway on state route two hundred thirty-one in 6 the town of Babylon, county of Suffolk, shall be dedicated to Detective 7 Thomas M. Inman. 8 § 2. Section 2 of chapter 398 of the laws of 2025 amending the highway 9 law relating to dedicating a portion of the state highway system to 10 "Port Authority Detective Thomas Inman", is amended to read as follows: 11 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 12 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 13 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 14 signing shall state "Bridge Dedicated to Detective Thomas M Inman". 15 However, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of 16 commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act 17 shall be one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such bridge 18 shall not be changed as a result of this act. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14329-03-6